tests/ky-verbsaux.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../tr-ky.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ky-tr.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] Forms of жат":
    бол<v><iv><prt_perf>+жат<aux><aor><p3><sg> : болуп жатат
    бол<v><iv><prt_perf>+жат<aux><aor><p3><sg> : болуп атат
    бар<v><iv><prt_impf>+жат<aux><aor><p3><sg> : бара жатат
    бар<v><iv><prt_impf>+жат<aux><aor><p3><sg> : баратат
    кел<v><iv><prt_impf>+жат<aux><aor><p3><sg> : келе жатат
    кел<v><iv><prt_impf>+жат<aux><aor><p3><sg> : келатат
